Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Artists and Works of Art.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 28, SLA 1988 provides:
“The provisions of AS

45.65.200

and

45.65.210

may not be construed to have an effect upon a written or oral contract or arrangement in existence on August 9, 1988, except by the mutual written consent of the parties.”

Sec. 45.65.200.
Artists and art dealer relationships.

When an artist delivers or causes to be delivered a work of art of the artist’s own creation to an art dealer for the purpose of sale, or exhibition and sale, on a commission, fee, or other basis of compensation, the acceptance of the work of art by the art dealer is a consignment, and

the art dealer is, with respect to the work of art, the agent of the artist;

the work of art is trust property in the hands of the art dealer for the benefit of the artist;

proceeds from the sale of the work of art are trust funds in the hands of the art dealer for the benefit of the artist;

the art dealer shall return an unsold work of art on demand of the artist;

the art dealer is strictly liable for loss or damage to a work of art while the work of art is in the possession of the art dealer; the value of a lost or damaged work of art is the value established by written agreement between the artist and art dealer before the loss or damage of the work of art; if no written agreement establishing the value of the work of art exists, the value is the fair market value of the work of art less the art dealer’s commission or fee; and

the dealer shall transmit the proceeds to the artist within 30 days of receipt by the dealer; if the sale is on installment, the money from each installment shall first be applied to pay any balance due the artist on the sale, unless the artist expressly agrees in writing that the proceeds on each installment are to be paid according to a percentage established by the consignment agreement.

A work of art initially received as a consignment remains trust property notwithstanding the subsequent purchase of the artwork by the art dealer directly or indirectly for the art dealer’s own account until the consignment price due to the artist is paid in full. The trusteeship continues until the fiduciary obligation of the art dealer with respect to the transaction is discharged in full.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.67.010.
Renumbered in 1988.

Cross references. —

For protection of consigned works of art from creditors of an art dealer, see AS

45.02.326(d)

.

Sec. 45.65.210.
Waiver.

A provision of a contract or agreement whereby the artist waives a provision of AS

45.65.200

is void except as provided in this subsection. An artist may waive the provisions of AS

45.65.200

if the waiver is clear, conspicuous, and agreed to in writing by the artist. A waiver under this subsection is not valid with respect to the proceeds of a work of art initially received as a consignment but subsequently purchased by the art dealer directly or indirectly for the art dealer’s own account.

A waiver under (a) of this section may not inure to the benefit of the art dealer’s creditors in a manner that is inconsistent with the artist’s rights under AS

45.65.200

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.67.020.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 45.65.250.
Definitions.

In AS

45.65.200

—

45.65.250

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“art dealer” means a person engaged in the business of selling works of art, other than a person exclusively engaged in the business of selling goods at public auction;

“artist” means the creator of a work of art or, if deceased, the heirs or personal representatives of the creator;

“consignment” means that no title to or estate in the goods or right to possession superior to that of the consignor vests in the consignee, notwithstanding the consignee’s power or authority to transfer and convey, to third person, all of the right, title, and interest of the consignor, in and to the goods;

“creditor” has the meaning given in AS

45.01.211

;

“work of art” means an original or multiple original art work including:

visual art such as a painting, sculpture, drawing, mosaic, or photograph;

calligraphy;

graphic art such as an etching, lithograph, offset print, or silk screen;

craft work in clay, textile, fiber, wood, metal, plastic, or glass materials;

mixed media such as a collage or any combination of art media in this paragraph;

art employing traditional native materials such as ivory, bone, grass, baleen, animal skins, wood, and furs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1988; am § 112 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.67.100.
Renumbered in 1988.

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (4), substituted “AS

45.01.211

” for “AS

45.01.201

” following “the meaning given in”.